Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 4
IMPLEMENTATION OF FEDERAL
"HIGHWAY SAFETY ACT OF 1966"

43-5-401. Duties and responsibility of governor.

The governor is hereby designated as the official of the state of Colorado having the ultimate responsibility for dealing with the federal government with respect to programs and activities pursuant to the federal "Highway Safety Act of 1966", and subsequent amendments thereto. To that end, he shall coordinate the activities of all departments and agencies of this state and its political subdivisions relating thereto.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 125, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-17-1.

Cross references:

For the federal "Highway Safety Act of 1966", see 80 Stat. 731, codified at 23 U.S.C. § 401 et seq.